Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2275.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-751, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-751. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Department" means the department of health services. 2. "Director" means the director of the department of health services. 3. "Midwife" means a person who is licensed under this article and who delivers a baby or provides health care related to pregnancy, labor, delivery and postpartum care of the mother and her infant. END_STATUTE